Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1351
Applicability.

(a) The Uniform Registration of Canadian Money Judgments Act applies to a Canadian judgment to the extent the judgment is within the scope of section 25-1339, if recognition of the judgment is sought to enforce the judgment.

(b) A Canadian judgment that grants both recovery of a sum of money and other relief may be registered under the Uniform Registration of Canadian Money Judgments Act, but only to the extent of the grant of recovery of a sum of money.

(c) A Canadian judgment regarding subject matter both within and not within the scope of the Uniform Registration of Canadian Money Judgments Act may be registered under the act, but only to the extent the judgment is with regard to subject matter within the scope of the act.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 15.